Mississippi, session 2026, HB1209.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The Department of Mental Health shall establish a program to make grants to regional commissions established under Section 41-19-33, counties and municipalities for the purpose of assisting in paying costs associated with (a) services provided by crisis stabilization units, (b) expenses of operating crisis stabilization unit facilities and (c) repairing, renovating, upgrading and improving crisis stabilization unit facilities.  The maximum amount of a grant made to a regional commission, county or municipality for a single project during a fiscal year cannot exceed Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00).  A regional commission, county or municipality may apply to the Department of Mental Health for a grant under this section in the manner provided for in this section. (2)  A regional commission, county or municipality desiring a grant under this section must submit an application to the Department of Mental Health.  The application must include a description of the purpose for which the grant is requested, the cost of the purpose for which the grant is requested, the amount of the grant requested, funds from any other sources that are available for such purpose and any other information required by the department. (3)  There is hereby created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "Crisis Stabilization Unit Facilities Fund", which shall consist of funds made available by the Legislature in any manner and funds from any other source designated for deposit into such fund.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund.  Monies in the fund shall be used by the Department of Mental Health, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes provided in this section. (4)  The Department of Mental Health shall have all powers necessary to implement and administer the program established under this section, and the department shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, necessary for the implementation of this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.